California statutes. Public Resources Code
(e) The approved plan shall be a public record, except that financial, production, or sales data reported to the department by the program operator is not a public record for purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall not be open to public inspection. The department may release financial, production, or sales data in summary form only so the information cannot be attributable to a specific producer or distributor or to any other entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 195.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42422.6.

(a) Within 12 months of the approval of the stewardship plan, the department pursuant to Section 42422.5, a program operator shall fully implement its stewardship program.

(b) A program operator may petition the department to investigate a noncompliant producer, and the department shall respond to the petition in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Financial Provisions [42423. - 42423.1.]

42423.

(a) No later than 90 days before a budget is submitted to the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the department and the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall notify each program operator of each agency’s respective anticipated actual and reasonable regulatory costs directly related to implementing and enforcing this chapter in relation to the program operator’s activities as the criteria for those costs are defined in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42420.2. This may include the actual and reasonable costs associated with regulatory regulation development pursuant to Section 42420.2 and other startup activities prior to stewardship plan submittal and approval, relative to the role of the program operator’s program compared to other programs.

(b) Program operators shall, on a schedule determined by the department and the Department of Toxic Substances Control, as applicable to each agency’s fees, pay the department and the Department of Toxic Substances Control, respectively, fees incurred to reimburse the department and the Department of Toxic Substances Control for incurred costs as described in subdivision (a). The fees shall not exceed the department’s or the Department of Toxic Substances Control’s actual and reasonable regulatory costs to implement and enforce this chapter as the criteria for those costs are defined in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42420.2. The fees shall be paid by each producer, either individually, if the producer is complying with the requirements of this chapter individually, or through a stewardship organization.

(c) (1) The department and the Department of Toxic Substances
 Control shall deposit all moneys received from a program operator pursuant to this section into the Covered Battery Recycling Fund, which is hereby established in the State Treasury.

(2) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Covered Battery Recycling Fund shall be expended by the department and the Department of Toxic Substances Control to implement and enforce this chapter, as well as to reimburse any outstanding loans made from other funds used to finance regulation development and startup costs of the department’s and the Department of Toxic Substances Control’s activities pursuant to this chapter.

(3) The moneys in the Covered Battery Recycling Fund shall not be expended for any other purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42423.1.

Each producer shall, either individually or through a stewardship organization, pay all administrative and operational costs associated with establishing and implementing the stewardship program in which it participates, including the cost of collection, transportation, recycling, and the safe and proper management of covered batteries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Records, Audits, and Reports for Covered Batteries [42424. - 42424.4.]

42424.

(a) A program operator shall keep board minutes, books, and records that clearly reflect the activities and transactions of the program operator.

(b) A program operator shall retain, at the program operator’s expense, an independent public accountant, certified in the United States, to annually audit the accounting books of the program operator.

(c) The program operator shall include the audit in its annual report submitted pursuant to Section 42424.1, commencing within 18 months of plan approval by the department. The department shall review the audit for compliance with this chapter and consistency with the program operator’s stewardship plan. The department shall notify the
 program operator of any compliance issues or inconsistencies.

(d) The department may conduct its own audit if it determines that an audit is necessary to enforce the requirements of this chapter and that the audit conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) is not adequate for this purpose. The program operator may obtain copies of the department’s audit upon request.

(e) The department shall not publicly disclose any confidential proprietary or trade secret information in an audit conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42424.1.

A program operator shall annually submit to the department, in the form and manner, and by the date, determined by the department, an annual report, which the department shall make publicly available that includes all of the following information for the preceding calendar year:

(a) The program operator’s costs and revenues.

(b) An estimate of the quantity of covered batteries sold in or into the state by the producers covered by the program operator’s stewardship plan, as determined by the best available commercial information, potentially including the application of California population data to the national sales information and the discarded covered batteries collected for recycling through
 the stewardship program.

(c) A list of the stewardship program’s collection sites, by name, location, and type.

(d) The total weight of primary and rechargeable batteries, respectively, that were collected.

(e) A list of each battery recycling facility used by the stewardship program, by name and location.

(f) An updated list of the names and corporate mailing addresses of producers, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 42420.1 and brands of covered batteries covered under the stewardship plan. 

(g) The total weight and number of covered batteries sold in or into the state attributed to a producer, who is a registered participant of the program operator’s plan, that are collected in
 the state and recycled by the program operator during the preceding calendar year, including a description of the methodology and information used to determine and calculate these values.

(h) The recycling efficiency rate of rechargeable and primary batteries that were recycled.

(i) Beginning January 1, 2027, a minimum recycling efficiency rate of 60 percent for rechargeable batteries and 70 percent for primary batteries shall be achieved. The weight of recovered materials from covered batteries counted towards the satisfaction of the recycling efficiency rate requirement shall be used.

(j) A description of methods used to collect, transport, and recycle covered batteries by the program operator.

(k) A description of outreach efforts and education,
 including, but not limited to, education and outreach provided to consumers, collection sites, manufacturers, distributors, and retailers by the program operator for the purpose of promoting the collection and recycling of covered batteries.

(l) (1) A report on coordination activities with other program operators, including covered battery collection and recycling programs and electronic waste recyclers, with regard to the proper management or recycling of collected covered batteries, for purposes of providing the efficient delivery of services and avoiding unnecessary duplication of effort and expense.

(2) A description of efforts undertaken by a program operator to implement the required labeling of covered batteries pursuant to Section 42422.1.

(m) Findings from the evaluation of the
 comprehensive statewide education and outreach program required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (o) of Section 42422.1.

(n) A description of any consultation with the California Environmental Protection Agency’s Environmental Justice Task Force and other relevant stakeholders for collecting covered batteries for recycling in areas and communities that face unique challenges.

(o) A demonstration of actions taken by the program operator to comply with the requirements established pursuant to Section 42422.1.

(p) (1) A report on activities the program operator has undertaken in relation to all of the following:

(A) Meeting the requirements established pursuant to Section 42422.1.

(B) Making progress on meeting the requirements established pursuant to Section 42422.1.

(C) Making progress on planned efforts to meet the requirements established pursuant to Section 42422.1.

(2) Factors to be considered for purposes of paragraph (1) may include, but are not limited to, availability of takeback options and no-cost local curbside collections services, proximity to recyclers and no-cost collection points and events, and the state of current recycling technology.

(q) A report on activities the program operator has undertaken to prioritize the use of recycling facilities located closer to the point of generation to minimize transportation emissions and increase accountability.

(r) If the program operator determines during a
 particular year that any of the activities undertaken to implement subdivision (q) were unsuccessful, the program operator shall identify the problems with the current activities, make modifications pursuant to the requirement in Section 42422.3, and report on other activities undertaken and progress made, in the following year’s annual report.

(s) An electronic copy in the form and manner determined by the department, and specified in the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42420.2 of any annual report, which shall include a brief explanation of how the program operator anticipates the activities may benefit the stewardship program. The program operator shall make these reports publicly available free of charge. If the report contains trade secret, proprietary, or confidential information protected under existing law, the program operator shall provide the department the report marked as trade secret, proprietary,
 confidential, and aversion of the report with that information redacted, and post the redacted report on its internet website.

(t) The progress toward attaining the goals included in the program operator’s stewardship plan.

(u) Any modifications or revisions to the stewardship plan, including those required pursuant to Section 42422.3, which are subject to review under Section 42422.5, intended to achieve the requirements established pursuant to Section 42422.1.

(v) Any other information deemed relevant by the program operator for the department to determine compliance with the approved stewardship plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42424.4.

(a) No later than 120 days after the date the department receives the annual report submitted by a program operator pursuant to Section 42424.1, the department shall notify the program operator if the annual report is compliant or noncompliant. If the department fails to act within 120 days of receipt of the annual report, the report shall be deemed approved.

(b) (1) If the department determines that the annual report is noncompliant due to failure to meet the requirements of Section 42424.1, the program operator shall resubmit a revised annual report addressing the department’s written reasons for its decision within 30 days of the department’s response.

(2) The department, within 60 days from the date a program operator resubmits a revised annual report, shall determine whether the annual report is compliant or noncompliant.

(3) If the department determines a revised annual report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) is noncompliant, the program operator may submit only one additional revised annual report, subject to review in accordance with paragraph (2).

(c) The department may consult with or submit an annual report for review to the Department of Toxic Substances Control if the department determines it is necessary for making a determination of compliance of an annual report. The duration of time the department takes for this consultation is not included in the time allotted to the department for review pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Enforcement [42425. - 42425.4.]

42425.

(a) Within 24 months of the effective date of regulations pursuant to Section 42420.2, and on or before July 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall post on its internet website a list of producers that are in compliance with this chapter. The department shall list, as appropriate, the reported brands of covered batteries for each producer.

(b) A producer that is not listed on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (a) that demonstrates compliance with this chapter before the next list is posted by the department may either be added to the internet website or be provided a certification letter from the department stating that the producer of a covered battery is in compliance with this chapter.

(c) (1) A retailer, importer, or distributor shall monitor the department’s internet website to determine if a producer, brand, or covered battery is in compliance with this chapter for that brand of covered battery.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (d), on and after the date a stewardship plan is approved by the department pursuant to Section 42422.5, a retailer, importer, or distributor shall not sell, distribute, offer for sale, or import a covered battery in or into the state for sale in the state unless the producer of the covered battery is listed as in compliance pursuant to this section for that brand and covered battery.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), a retailer, importer, or distributor may sell, offer for sale, import, or distribute a
 covered battery if, on the date the retailer or distributor sells or offers for sale the covered battery in or into the state, the producer, brand, or covered battery was listed as compliant on the department’s internet website.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), a retailer or distributor may, for any existing inventory in stock before the initial list was posted by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), sell or distribute that inventory for sale in or into the state.

(e) (1) If the department determines a producer is not in compliance with this chapter, the department shall remove the producer, along with its brands and covered batteries, from the list of compliant producers posted on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (a). 

(2) The department
 shall relist on its internet website a producer, along with its brands and covered batteries, if the department subsequently determines that the producer is in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42425.1.

(a) The department may impose an administrative civil penalty on a producer, program operator, stewardship organization, manufacturer, distributor, retailer, importer, recycler, or collection site that is in violation of this chapter. The amount of the administrative civil penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day, but, if the violation is intentional, knowing, or reckless, the department may impose an administrative civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day. The department shall establish, through regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42420.2, a process that shall include an informal hearing process by which the penalties will be assessed.

(b) The department shall deposit all penalties
 collected pursuant to this section into the Covered Battery Recycling Penalty Account, which is hereby created in the Covered Battery Recycling Fund. These moneys shall be available for expenditure upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(c) This chapter does not limit or restrict the Department of Toxic Substances Control’s enforcement authority pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code and its implementing regulations.

(d) The Administrative Adjudication Bill of Rights, as set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 11425.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, applies to hearings conducted under this chapter and mandates minimum due process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 196.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42425.2.

(a) Upon a written finding that a producer, program operator, stewardship organization, manufacturer, distributor, retailer, importer, recycler, or collection site has not met a material requirement of this chapter, in addition to any other penalties authorized under this chapter, the department may, after affording the entity a reasonable opportunity to respond to, or rebut, the finding, take any of the following actions to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter:

(1) Revoke the program operator’s stewardship plan approval or require the program operator to resubmit the plan.

(2) Remove the producer, along with its brands and covered batteries from the
 department’s list of compliant producers, as specified in Section 42425.

(3) Impose additional compliance reporting requirements.

(4) Post the noncompliant entity onto a list of noncompliant entities.

(b) If a stewardship plan is revoked pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or terminated by the program operator that submitted the plan, a producer no longer subject to that plan may, without being subject to administrative civil penalties pursuant to Section 42425.1, sell or offer for sale covered batteries in or into the state for a period of up to one year after the stewardship plan was terminated or revoked if the producer continues to operate under the most recent approved stewardship plan to which the producer was subject.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42425.3.

(a) A producer, program operator, stewardship organization, manufacturer, distributor, retailer, importer, recycler, or collection site shall do both of the following:

(1) Upon request, provide the department with reasonable and timely access, as determined by the department, to its facilities and operations, as necessary to determine compliance with this chapter.

(2) Upon request, provide the department and the Department of Toxic Substances Control with relevant records necessary to determine compliance with this chapter.

(b) The records required by this chapter shall be maintained and accessible for three
 years. All reports and records provided to the department pursuant to this chapter shall be provided under penalty of perjury.

(c) (1) The department may impose administrative civil penalties pursuant to Section 42425.1 on a producer, program operator, stewardship organization, manufacturer, distributor, retailer, importer, recycler, or collection site that fails to provide the department with the access required pursuant to this section. 

(2) The department may post a notice on the department’s internet website that is maintained pursuant to Section 42425 that a producer that fails to provide the department with access pursuant to this section, along with the producer’s brands and covered batteries, is no longer in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42425.4.

After the time for judicial review under Section 11523 of the Government Code has expired, the department may apply to the small claims court or superior court, depending on the jurisdictional amount and any other remedy sought, in the county where the penalties, restitution, or other remedy was imposed by the department, for a judgment to collect any unpaid civil penalties or restitution or to enforce any other remedy provided by this chapter. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the final agency order or decision, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment. The court clerk shall enter the judgment immediately in conformity with the application. The judgment so entered shall have the same force and effect as, and shall be subject to all the provisions of law relating to,
 a judgment in a civil action, and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court. The court shall make enforcement of the judgment a priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Antitrust Immunity [42426. - 42426.]

42426.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an action specified in subdivision (b) that is taken by a program operator that relates to any of the following is not a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or the Unfair Competition Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to all of the following actions taken by a program operator:

(1) The creation,
 implementation, or management of a stewardship plan approved or conditionally approved by the department pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42422) and the determination of the types or quantities of covered batteries recycled or otherwise managed pursuant to a stewardship plan.

(2) The determination of the cost and structure of an approved stewardship plan.

(3) The establishment, administration, collection, or disbursement of a charge associated with funding the implementation of this chapter.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to an agreement that does any of the following:

(1) Fixes a price of or for covered batteries, except for an agreement related to costs or charges associated with participation in a stewardship plan approved or
 conditionally approved by the department and otherwise in accordance with this chapter.

(2) Fixes the output or production of covered batteries.

(3) Restricts the geographic area in which, or customers to whom, covered batteries will be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Preemption and Interstate Collaboration  [42427. - 42428.]

42427.

(a) This chapter preempts all rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, and other laws adopted by a city, county, city and county, municipality, or local agency on or after January 1, 2023, regarding stewardship programs for covered batteries.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the recycling of covered batteries is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this chapter applies to all cities, including charter cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42428.

If another state implements a covered battery recycling program, a program operator may, consistent with the requirements of this chapter, collaborate with that state to conserve resources necessary to efficiently manage and implement the program operator’s stewardship program in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Recycled Battery Programs [42440. - 42450.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Lead-Acid Battery Program [42440. - 42443.]

42440.

For the purposes of this chapter, “lead-acid battery” means any battery which is primarily composed of both lead and sulfuric acid, with a capacity of six volts or more, and which is used for any of the following purposes:

(a) As a starting battery which is designed to deliver a high burst of energy necessary to crank an engine until it starts.

(b) As a motive power battery which is designed to provide the sources of power for propulsion or operation.

(c) As a stationary standby battery which is designed to be used in systems where the battery acts as a source of emergency power, serving as a backup in case of failure or interruption in the flow of power from the primary source.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42441.

“Recycled lead-acid battery” means any lead-acid battery which contains a minimum percentage of postconsumer recovered lead. The required minimum percentage of postconsumer recovered lead shall be determined by the board in consultation with the Market Development Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42442.

On or before January 1, 1991, all lead-acid batteries purchased by any state agency for, and, at the next required installation of a battery in, an automobile or light truck owned or operated by the state agency, the battery shall be a recycled lead-acid battery, to the extent that all existing stock of nonrecycled batteries have been utilized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42443.

The number of recycled lead-acid batteries purchased each year by the Department of General Services shall be tabulated and forwarded to the board on or before March 31 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1038, Sec. 22.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Household Battery Program [42450. - 42450.]

42450.

(a) The board may conduct a study on the disposal and recyclability of household batteries, taking into account any studies completed or underway elsewhere, including, but not limited to, any studies by the Environmental Protection Agency. The board may participate in the study.

(b) The study may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The effect of used household batteries on solid waste landfills and transformation facilities, including any threats to human health or environment.

(2) The recyclability of used household batteries, including, but not limited to, the following topics:

(A) Applicable recycling technologies and their effectiveness.

(B) Collection systems.

(C) Possible adverse effects on human health or the environment resulting from exposure to household batteries at all stages of the recycling process.

(D) Costs and revenues associated with recycling, including avoided disposal costs.

(E) Development of markets for products derived from recycled household batteries.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “household batteries” means batteries made of mercury, alkaline, carbon-zinc, nickel-cadmium, and other batteries typically generated as household waste, including, but not limited to, batteries used in hearing aids, cameras, watches, computers, calculators, flashlights, lanterns, standby and emergency lighting, portable radio and television sets, meters, toys, and clocks, but excluding lead-acid batteries as defined in Section 42440.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 711, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Lithium-Ion Batteries [42450.5. - 42450.5.]

42450.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Automobile dismantler” has the same definition as in Section 220 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) “Motor vehicle” has the same definition as in Section 415 of the Vehicle Code.

(3) “Vehicle manufacturer” has the same definition as in Section 672 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) On or before April 1, 2019, the Secretary for Environmental Protection shall convene the Lithium-Ion Car Battery Recycling Advisory Group to review, and advise the Legislature on, policies pertaining to the recovery and recycling of lithium-ion
 vehicle batteries sold with motor vehicles in the state. Until April 1, 2022, the advisory group shall meet at least quarterly. The advisory group shall consult with universities and research institutions that have conducted research in the area of battery recycling, with manufacturers of electric and hybrid vehicles, and with the recycling industry. The Secretary for Environmental Protection shall appoint at least one member to the advisory group from each of the following:

(1) The Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(2) The Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(3) A vehicle manufacturer.

(4) An organization that represents one or more vehicle manufacturers.

(5) An
 electronic waste recycler or an organization that represents one or more electronic waste recyclers.

(6) An automotive repair dealer or an organization that represents one or more automotive repair dealers.

(7) An automobile dismantler or an organization that represents one or more automobile dismantlers.

(8) An environmental organization that specializes in waste reduction and recycling.

(9) A representative of the energy storage industry.

(10) A lithium-ion vehicle battery manufacturer.

(11) A standards-developing organization that has a focus on automotive engineering.

(c) On or before April 1, 2022, the Lithium-Ion Car Battery Recycling Advisory Group shall submit policy recommendations to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, aimed at ensuring that as close to 100 percent as possible of lithium-ion vehicle batteries in the state are reused or recycled at end-of-life in a safe and cost-effective manner. The policy recommendations shall reflect entire life-cycle considerations for lithium-ion vehicle batteries, including, but not limited to, opportunities for and barriers to the reuse of those batteries as energy storage systems after they are removed from the vehicle, best management considerations for those batteries at end-of-life, and the overall effect of different management practices on the environment. In developing the policy recommendations, the advisory group shall consider both in-state and out-of-state options for the recycling of lithium-ion vehicle batteries.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 235.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.4. Rechargeable Battery Recycling Act of 2006 [42451. - 42457.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [42451. - 42451.]

42451.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Rechargeable Battery Recycling Act of 2006.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Department of Toxic Substances Control has determined that, due to their hazardous material content, the solid waste disposal of all household and rechargeable batteries should be prohibited. A regulation authorizing a temporary householder exemption to this prohibition will expire, by its own terms, in February 2006.

(2) The purpose of this chapter is to enact a comprehensive and innovative system for the reuse, recycling, and proper and legal disposal of previously used rechargeable batteries.

(3) It is the further purpose of this chapter to enact a law that establishes a program that is convenient for consumers and the public to return, recycle, and ensure the safe and environmentally sound disposal of used rechargeable batteries, and that provides for a system that does not charge the consumer when a rechargeable battery is returned.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the cost associated with the handling, recycling, and disposal of used rechargeable batteries be the responsibility of the producers and consumers of rechargeable batteries, and not local government or their service providers, state government, or taxpayers.

(5) In order to reduce the likelihood of illegal disposal of hazardous materials, it is the intent of this chapter to ensure that all costs associated with the proper management of used rechargeable batteries is internalized by the producers and consumers of rechargeable batteries at or before the point of purchase, and not at the point of discard.

(6) Manufacturers and retailers of rechargeable batteries, in working to achieve the goals and objectives of this chapter, should have the flexibility to partner with each other and with those private and nonprofit business enterprises that currently provide collection and processing services to develop and promote a safe and effective used rechargeable battery recycling system for California.

(7) The producers of household and rechargeable batteries should reduce and, to the extent feasible, ultimately phase out the use of hazardous materials in household and rechargeable batteries.

(8) Household and rechargeable batteries, to the greatest extent feasible, should be designed for extended life and reuse.

(9) The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the safe, cost free, and convenient collection, reuse, and recycling of 100 percent of the rechargeable batteries discarded or offered for recycling in the state.

(10) In establishing a cost-effective system for the recovery, reuse, recycling, and proper disposal of used rechargeable batteries, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage manufacturers and retailers to build on the retailer take-back systems initiated by the Rechargeable Battery Recycling Corporation and others.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Inoperative September 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 42457.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 42457.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [42452. - 42452.]

42452.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) “Consumer” means a purchaser or owner of a rechargeable battery. “Consumer” also includes a business, corporation, limited partnership, nonprofit organization, or governmental entity, but does not include an entity involved in a wholesale transaction between a distributor and retailer.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(c) “Rechargeable battery” means a small, nonvehicular, rechargeable nickel-cadmium, nickel metal hydride, lithium ion, or sealed lead-acid battery, or a battery pack containing these types of batteries.

(d) “Retailer” means a person who makes a retail sale of a rechargeable battery to a consumer in this state, including a manufacturer of a rechargeable battery who sells that rechargeable battery directly to a consumer. A sale includes, but is not limited to, transactions conducted through sales outlets, catalogs, or the Internet, or any other similar electronic means, but does not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction with a distributor or retailer. “Retailer” does not include a person who sells primarily food and is listed in the Progressive Marketing Grocers Guidebook. “Retailer” does not include a person who has less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) annually in gross sales.

(e) (1) “Sell” or “sale” means a transfer for consideration of title or of the right to use, by lease or sales contract, including, but not limited to, transactions conducted through sales outlets, catalogs, or the Internet or any other similar electronic means, but does not include a wholesale transaction with a distributor or a retailer.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision and subdivision (d), “distributor” means a person who sells a rechargeable battery to a retailer.

(f) “Used rechargeable battery” means a rechargeable battery that has been previously used and is made available, by a consumer, for reuse, recycling, or proper disposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Inoperative September 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 42457.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 42457.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rechargeable Battery Recycling [42453. - 42454.]

42453.

(a) (1) On and after July 1, 2006, every retailer shall have in place a system for the acceptance and collection of used rechargeable batteries for reuse, recycling, or proper disposal.

(2) A retailer is not subject to the requirements of this chapter for the sale of rechargeable batteries that are contained in or packaged with a battery-operated device.

(b) A system for the acceptance and collection of used rechargeable batteries for reuse, recycling, or proper disposal shall, at a minimum, include all of the following elements:

(1) (A) The take-back at no cost to the consumer of a used rechargeable battery, the type or brand of which the retailer sold or previously sold.

(B) A retailer’s no-cost take-back obligation may be limited to a quantity equal to the number sold at the time of the take-back or previously sold to the consumer.

(2) If the retailer sells a rechargeable battery through a catalog order, telephone order, or other method that does not involve in-store sales, the retailer shall be deemed in compliance with this article if the retailer provides a reasonable notice either at the time of purchase or delivery to the consumer of an opportunity to return used rechargeable batteries at no cost for reuse, recycling, or proper disposal.

(A) The opportunity to return the rechargeable batteries shall be either through the retailer’s take-back program established pursuant to paragraph (1) or through participation with the Rechargeable Battery Recycling Corporation or similar take-back and recycling program.

(B) The notice shall include informational materials, including, but not limited to, Internet Web site links or a telephone number, placed on the invoice or purchase order, or packaged with the battery, that provide consumers access to obtain more information about the opportunities and locations for no-cost battery recycling.

(3) Making information available to consumers about rechargeable battery recycling opportunities provided by the retailer and encouraging consumers to utilize those opportunities. This information may include, but is not limited to, one or more of the following:
